Utah statutes.
16-6a-1702.   Application to foreign nonprofit corporations.

(1)  A foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state on April 30, 2001, is subject to this chapter, but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to conduct affairs under this chapter.

(2)  A foreign nonprofit corporation that is qualified to do business in this state under the provisions of Title 16, Chapter 8, which provisions were repealed by Laws of Utah 1961, Chapter 28, shall be authorized to transact business in this state subject to all of the limitations, restrictions, liabilities, and duties prescribed in this chapter.

(3)  This chapter shall apply to all foreign nonprofit corporations sole qualified to do business in this state with respect to mergers and consolidations.



Amended by Chapter 250, 2008 General Session

